Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 19 Junkyard Control

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to junk dealers, see chapter 18 of this title.

As to power of city to license and regulate junkyards, see § 15-1-103(a)(xliii).

As to the state highway commission generally, see §§

24-2-101

through

24-2-115

.

§ 33-19-101.
Citation of chapter.

This act [§§

33-19-101

through

33-19-110

] may be cited as the Junkyard Control Act.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.1.

§ 33-19-102.
Declaration of legislative policy; nonconforming junkyards deemed public nuisance.

It is hereby declared to be in the public interest to regulate and restrict the establishment, operation, and maintenance of junkyards in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary highway systems within this state. The legislature hereby finds and declares that junkyards which do not conform to the requirements of this act [§§

33-19-101

through

33-19-110

] are public nuisances.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.2.

§ 33-19-103.
Definitions.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms when used have the meanings assigned to them:

Junk. Old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, or junked, dismantled or wrecked automobiles, or parts thereof, iron, steel, and other old or scrap ferrous or nonferrous material;

Automobile Graveyard. Any establishment or place of business which is maintained, used, or operated for storage, keeping, buying or selling wrecked, scrapped, ruined, or dismantled motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts;

Junkyard. An establishment or place of business which is maintained, operated or used for storing, keeping, buying or selling junk, or for the maintenance or operation of an automobile graveyard, and the term shall include garbage dumps and sanitary fills;

Interstate System. That portion of the national system of interstate and defense highways located within this state, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated by the transportation commission and approved by the United States department of transportation pursuant to the provisions of title 23, United States Code, “Highways”;

Primary System. That portion of connected main highways, as officially designated or as may hereafter be so designated by the transportation commission and approved by the United States department of transportation pursuant to the provisions of title 23, United States Code, “Highways”;

Commission. Transportation commission of Wyoming;

Engineer. State highway engineer or his duly authorized representative;

Federal Interstate System. National system of interstate and defense highways;

Person. Any individual, firm, agency, company, association, partnership, business, trust, joint stock company, or corporation who operates or allows a junkyard to be placed or to remain on premises controlled by him.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.3; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-19-104.
Time for compliance for previously lawfully established junkyards.

Except as otherwise provided in this act [§§

33-19-101

through

33-19-110

], the owner of any junkyard that was lawful when established, but that is in violation of W.S. 33-19-105(b) and that cannot, as a practical matter to be determined by the engineer, be screened, may maintain such junkyard without liability under W.S.

33-19-110

as follows:

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 129, § 202.

If the junkyard was established after October 22, 1965 and if the portion of the highway along which it was established became a part of the federal interstate system of the federal aid primary system after October 22, 1965, the junkyard may be maintained until, but not beyond five (5) years after the date of erection or the date the portion of the highway involved became a part of the federal interstate system or the federal aid primary system, whichever date is later.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.4; 2011, ch. 129, § 202.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a)(i), which read: “If the junkyard was established on or before October 22, 1965, along a portion of a highway on the federal interstate system or the federal aid primary system, the junkyard may be maintained until, but not beyond July 1, 1970.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-19-105.
When license required; license fee; limitations on issuance of license.

No person shall establish, operate or maintain a junkyard, any portion of which is within one thousand (1,000) feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the interstate or primary systems, without obtaining a junkyard license from the commission. The commission shall establish and collect fees for the issuance of junkyard licenses, and all fees collected shall be paid to the commission.

No junkyard license shall be issued for the establishment, operation or maintenance of a junkyard within one thousand (1,000) feet to the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the interstate or primary systems except for junkyards:

Screened by natural objects, plantings, fences or other appropriate means so as not to be visible from the main traveled way of the interstate or primary systems, or otherwise removed from sight; or

Located within areas zoned for industrial use under authority of law; or

Located within unzoned industrial areas as determined from actual land uses and defined by regulations promulgated by the commission; or

Those which are not visible from the main traveled way of the highway system.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.5.

§ 33-19-106.
Screening; relocation or removal of junkyards; condemnation proceedings.

If considered feasible by the commission, any junkyard in existence on the effective date of this act [§§

33-19-101

through

33-19-110

] which is located within one thousand (1,000) feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the interstate or primary systems and is visible from the main traveled way of the interstate or primary systems shall be screened by the commission. The screening shall be at locations on the right-of-way or in areas outside the right-of-way acquired for the purpose, so that the junkyard is not visible from the main traveled way of the interstate or primary systems.

When the commission determines that the topography of the land adjoining the interstate or primary systems will not permit adequate screening of such junkyards, or that the screening would not be economically feasible, the commission may require the relocation, removal or disposal of the junk and junkyard by negotiation or condemnation. When the commission determines that it is in the best interests of the state, it may acquire such land or interest in land as necessary to provide adequate screening of the junkyards.

Damages resulting from any taking of property in eminent domain shall include, but not be limited to acquisition costs, leasehold value and moving costs.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.6; Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1967, ch. 214, carried no provision as to its effective date, but was enacted at a session that adjourned on February 18, 1967. See §

8-1-108

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Eminent Domain Act: Comment on the Act and Rule 71.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 739 (1983).

§ 33-19-107.
Injunction to abate junkyards which are nuisances.

The establishment, operation or maintenance of any junkyard contrary to the provisions of this act [§§

33-19-101

through

33-19-110

] is a public nuisance and the commission may apply to the district court of the county in which the junkyard is located for an injunction to abate the nuisance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.7.

§ 33-19-108.
Agreements with secretary of commerce.

The commission may enter into agreements with the secretary of commerce pursuant to title 23, United States Code, relating to the control of outdoor advertising and junkyards in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary systems, and to take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of the agreements.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.8.

Federal law. —

For federal provisions on control of outdoor advertising, see 23 U.S.C.S. § 131. For federal provisions on control of junkyards, see 23 U.S.C.S. § 136

§ 33-19-109.
More restrictive ordinances or regulations saved; just compensation required for taking of property.

Nothing in this act [§§

33-19-101

through

33-19-110

] affects the provision of any lawful ordinance or regulation which is more restrictive than the provisions of this act, and nothing authorizes the taking of real or personal property, or restriction of its reasonable and existing use, without just compensation.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.9.

§ 33-19-110.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Any person violating any provision of this act [§§

33-19-101

through

33-19-110

] is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 214, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 33-259.10.

Cross references. —

As to definition of misdemeanor, see §

6-10-101

.